New York, session 2025-2026, A7040.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The alcoholic beverage control law is amended by adding a 2 new section 64-f to read as follows: 3 § 64-f. License to sell liquor on premises commonly known as a for- 4 profit club. 1. Any person may make an application to the state liquor 5 authority to operate a "for-profit club" which is operated solely for a 6 recreational, social, patriotic, political, benevolent, communal work- 7 space, corporate dining space, or athletic purpose. 8 2. Such application shall be in such form and shall contain such 9 information as shall be required by the liquor authority and shall be 10 accompanied by a check or draft in the amount required by this article 11 for such license. The fee for such license shall be twenty thousand 12 dollars annually. 13 3. Section fifty-four of this chapter shall control so far as applica- 14 ble the procedure in connection with such application. For-profit clubs 15 that apply for a license pursuant to this section are also authorized to 16 apply for a temporary retail permit as provided for in section ninety- 17 seven-a of this chapter. 18 4. Such for-profit club license shall in form and in substance be a 19 license to the person specifically licensed to operate a for-profit club 20 and sell liquor at retail exclusively to members in good standing and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00724-08-5 A. 7040--B 2 1 their guests under the by-laws of the for-profit club to be consumed on 2 the premises specifically licensed. Such license shall also be deemed to 3 include a license to sell liquor, wine, beer, cider, mead and/or braggot 4 at retail exclusively to members in good standing and their guests under 5 the by-laws of the for-profit club to be consumed on the premises under 6 the same terms and conditions, without the payment of any additional 7 fee. 8 5. (a) A license under this section shall be required of any person, 9 corporation, partnership, company, or any other for-profit entity which 10 is the owner, lessee or occupant of a premises used exclusively for the 11 for-profit club purposes, and which is operated solely for a recreation- 12 al, social, patriotic, political, benevolent, communal workspace, corpo- 13 rate dining space, or athletic purpose. A "member" of a for-profit club 14 shall mean a person who whether a charter member or admitted in agree- 15 ment with the by-laws of the for-profit club, has become a bona fide 16 member thereof, who maintains membership by the payment of annual dues 17 in a bona fide manner in accordance with the by-laws of the for-profit 18 club and whose name and address is entered on the list of members of the 19 for-profit club. A for-profit club must have one hundred or more 20 members. 21 (b) For the purpose of a for-profit club license issued pursuant to 22 this section solely for use as corporate dining space for their employ- 23 ees and clients shall: 24 (i) include only such space directly used for corporate dining 25 purposes where food and beverages are regularly available to employees, 26 clients, and guests; 27 (ii) authorize that licensees do not have to meet member requirements; 28 (iii) authorize contracts with a third party licensed by the authority 29 to provide food and beverages so long as any third party contract is 30 disclosed to the authority; and 31 (iv) be responsible for maintaining records, filing all necessary 32 applications, and providing other such documentation required or deemed 33 necessary to be submitted to the authority. 34 6. The authority shall consider all of the following in determining 35 whether public convenience and advantage and the public interest will be 36 promoted by the granting of a license pursuant to this section: 37 (a) the number, classes and character of licenses in proximity to the 38 location and in the particular municipality or subdivision thereof; 39 (b) evidence that applicants have secured all necessary licenses and 40 permits from the state and all other governing bodies; 41 (c) the effect that the granting of the license will have on vehicular 42 traffic and parking in the proximity of the location; 43 (d) the existing noise level at the location and any increase in noise 44 level that would be generated by the proposed premises; 45 (e) the history of liquor violations and reported criminal activity at 46 the proposed premises; 47 (f) any purpose or intention of discrimination by the applicant or any 48 individual, corporation, partnership, company, or any other for-profit 49 entity which is the owner, lessee or occupant of the premises to be 50 licensed as a for-profit club premises; and 51 (g) any other factors specified by law or regulation that are relevant 52 to determine the public convenience or advantage and necessary to find 53 that the granting of such license shall be in the public interest. 54 7. No for-profit club license shall be granted for any premises which 55 shall be: A. 7040--B 3 1 (a) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 2 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 3 place of worship; or 4 (b) in a city, town or village having a population of twenty thousand 5 or more within five hundred feet of an existing premises licensed and 6 operating pursuant to the provisions of this section, or within five 7 hundred feet of three or more existing premises licensed and operating 8 pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty- 9 four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this article. 10 (c) The measurements in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision are 11 to be taken in straight lines from the center of the nearest entrance of 12 the premises sought to be licensed to the center of the nearest entrance 13 of such school, church, synagogue or other place of worship or to the 14 center of the nearest entrance of each such premises licensed and oper- 15 ating pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, sixty-four-a, 16 sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this article; except 17 that no license shall be denied to any premises at which a license under 18 this chapter has been in existence continuously from a date prior to the 19 date when a building on the same street or avenue and within two hundred 20 feet of said premises has been occupied exclusively as a school, church, 21 synagogue or other place of worship; and except that no license shall be 22 denied to any premises, which is within five hundred feet of an existing 23 premises licensed and operating pursuant to the provisions of this 24 section or which is within five hundred feet of three or more existing 25 premises licensed and operating pursuant to this section and sections 26 sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or 27 sixty-four-d of this article, at which a license under this chapter has 28 been in existence continuously on or prior to November first, nineteen 29 hundred ninety-three. The liquor authority, in its discretion, may 30 authorize the removal of any such licensed premises to a different 31 location on the same street or avenue, within two hundred feet of said 32 school, church, synagogue or other place of worship, provided that such 33 new location is not within a closer distance to such school, church, 34 synagogue or other place of worship. 35 (d) Within the context of this subdivision, the word "entrance" shall 36 mean a door of a school, of a house of worship, or of premises licensed 37 and operating pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, sixty- 38 four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this article 39 or of the premises sought to be licensed, regularly used to give ingress 40 to students of the school, to the general public attending the place of 41 worship, and to patrons or guests of the premises licensed and operating 42 pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty- 43 four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this article or of the 44 premises sought to be licensed, except that where a school or house of 45 worship or premises licensed and operating pursuant to this section and 46 sections sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or 47 sixty-four-d of this article or the premises sought to be licensed is 48 set back from a public thoroughfare, the walkway or stairs leading to 49 any such door shall be deemed an entrance; and the measurement shall be 50 taken to the center of the walkway or stairs at the point where it meets 51 the building line or public thoroughfare. A door which has no exterior 52 hardware, or which is used solely as an emergency or fire exit, or for 53 maintenance purposes, or which leads directly to a part of a building 54 not regularly used by the general public or patrons, is not deemed an 55 "entrance". A. 7040--B 4 1 (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subdivi- 2 sion, the authority may issue a license pursuant to this section for a 3 premises which shall be within five hundred feet of an existing premises 4 licensed and operating pursuant to the provisions of this section or 5 within five hundred feet of three or more existing premises licensed and 6 operating pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, 7 sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this 8 article if, after consultation with the municipality or community board, 9 it determines that granting such license would be in the public inter- 10 est. Before it may issue any such license, the authority shall conduct a 11 hearing, upon notice to the applicant and the municipality or community 12 board, and shall state and file in its office its reasons therefor. The 13 hearing may be rescheduled, adjourned or continued, and the authority 14 shall give notice to the applicant and the municipality or community 15 board of any such rescheduled, adjourned or continued hearing. Before 16 the authority issues any said license, the authority or one or more of 17 the commissioners thereof may, in addition to the hearing required by 18 this paragraph, also conduct a public meeting regarding said license, 19 upon notice to the applicant and the municipality or community board. 20 The public meeting may be rescheduled, adjourned or continued, and the 21 authority shall give notice to the applicant and the municipality or 22 community board of any such rescheduled, adjourned or continued public 23 meeting. Notice to the municipality or community board shall mean writ- 24 ten notice mailed by the authority to such municipality or community 25 board at least fifteen days in advance of any hearing scheduled pursuant 26 to this paragraph. Upon the request of the authority, any municipality 27 or community board may waive the fifteen day notice requirement. No 28 premises having been granted a license pursuant to this section shall be 29 denied a renewal of such license upon the grounds that such premises are 30 within five hundred feet of an existing premises licensed and operating 31 pursuant to the provisions of this section or within five hundred feet 32 of a building or buildings wherein three or more premises are licensed 33 and operating pursuant to this section and sections sixty-four, sixty- 34 four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, and/or sixty-four-d of this article. 35 (f) Within the context of this subdivision, a building occupied as a 36 place of worship does not cease to be "exclusively" occupied as a place 37 of worship by incidental uses that are not of a nature to detract from 38 the predominant character of the building as a place of worship, such 39 uses which include, but which are not limited to: (i) the conduct of 40 legally authorized games of bingo or other games of chance held as a 41 means of raising funds for the not-for-profit religious organization 42 which conducts services at the place of worship or for other not-for- 43 profit organizations or groups; use of the building for fund-raising 44 performances by or benefitting the not-for-profit religious organization 45 which conducts services at the place of worship or other not-for-profit 46 organizations or groups; (ii) the use of the building by other religious 47 organizations or groups for religious services or other purposes; the 48 conduct of social activities by or for the benefit of the congregants; 49 the use of the building for meetings held by organizations or groups 50 providing bereavement counseling to persons having suffered the loss of 51 a loved one, or providing advice or support for conditions or diseases 52 including, but not limited to, alcoholism, drug addiction, cancer, cere- 53 bral palsy, Parkinson's disease, or Alzheimer's disease; (iii) the use 54 of the building for blood drives, health screenings, health information 55 meetings, yoga classes, exercise classes or other activities intended to 56 promote the health of the congregants or other persons; and (iv) use of A. 7040--B 5 1 the building by non-congregant members of the community for private 2 social functions. The building occupied as a place of worship does not 3 cease to be "exclusively" occupied as a place of worship where the not- 4 for-profit religious organization occupying the place of worship accepts 5 the payment of funds to defray costs related to another party's use of 6 the building. 7 8. All other provisions of this chapter relative to licenses to sell 8 liquor at retail for consumption on the premises shall apply as far as 9 applicable. 10 9. For purposes of this section, for-profit club licensees as author- 11 ized herein shall be responsible for any violations of this chapter or 12 the rules of the authority occurring while the license is in effect. 13 Liability under the provisions of sections 11-100 and 11-101 of the 14 general obligations law shall accrue to the licensee. 15 10. All for-profit club licensees shall be subject to such rules and 16 regulations by the authority as is deemed necessary and are in conform- 17 ity with the provisions of this chapter. 18 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 110-b of the alcoholic beverage control 19 law, as amended by chapter 560 of the laws of 2011, the opening para- 20 graph as amended by section 1 of part H of chapter 55 of the laws of 21 2024, paragraphs (c) and (d) as amended and paragraph (e) as added by 22 chapter 106 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 23 1. Not more than two hundred seventy days before filing any of the 24 following applications, an applicant shall notify the municipality in 25 which the premises is located of such applicant's intent to file such an 26 application: 27 (a) for a license issued pursuant to section fifty-five, fifty-five-a, 28 sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, 29 sixty-four-f, eighty-one or eighty-one-a of this chapter; 30 (b) for a renewal under section one hundred nine of this chapter of a 31 license issued pursuant to section fifty-five, fifty-five-a, sixty-four, 32 sixty-four-a, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, sixty-four-f, eighty-one or 33 eighty-one-a of this chapter if the premises is located within the city 34 of New York; 35 (c) for approval of an alteration under section ninety-nine-d of this 36 chapter if the premises is located within the city of New York and 37 licensed pursuant to section fifty-five, fifty-five-a, sixty-four, 38 sixty-four-a, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, sixty-four-f, eighty-one or 39 eighty-one-a of this chapter; 40 (d) for approval of a substantial corporate change under section nine- 41 ty-nine-d of this chapter if the premises is located within the city of 42 New York and licensed pursuant to section fifty-five, fifty-five-a, 43 sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, sixty-four-f, 44 eighty-one or eighty-one-a of this chapter; or 45 (e) for a temporary retail permit issued under paragraph (b) of subdi- 46 vision one of section ninety-seven-a of this chapter where the estab- 47 lishment is to be licensed pursuant to section fifty-five, fifty-five-a, 48 sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, 49 sixty-four-f, eighty-one or eighty-one-a of this chapter located in a 50 city with a population of one million or more people. If an applicant 51 subject to this paragraph shall, after filing an application for a 52 retail license and providing proper notice for such application pursuant 53 to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, subsequently file an application 54 for a temporary retail permit pursuant to section ninety-seven-a of this 55 chapter at the same premises, such applicant must file additional notice 56 pursuant to this paragraph; provided, however, such notice will be A. 7040--B 6 1 effective at the later of its proper service under this section or thir- 2 ty days from the date proper notice was served under paragraph (a) of 3 this subdivision for the license at the same premises. 4 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 17 of the alcoholic beverage control 5 law, as amended by section 8 of chapter 522 of the laws of 2018, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 3. To revoke, cancel or suspend for cause any license or permit issued 8 under this chapter and/or to impose a civil penalty for cause against 9 any holder of a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter. Any 10 civil penalty so imposed shall not exceed the sum of ten thousand 11 dollars as against the holder of any retail permit issued pursuant to 12 sections ninety-five, ninety-seven, ninety-eight, ninety-nine-d, and 13 paragraph f of subdivision one of section ninety-nine-b of this chapter, 14 and as against the holder of any retail license issued pursuant to 15 sections fifty-three-a, fifty-four, fifty-four-a, fifty-five, fifty- 16 five-a, sixty-three, sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, 17 sixty-four-c, sixty-four-f, seventy-six-f, seventy-nine, eighty-one and 18 eighty-one-a of this chapter, and the sum of thirty thousand dollars as 19 against the holder of a license issued pursuant to sections thirty, 20 thirty-one, fifty-three, sixty-one-a, sixty-one-b, seventy-six, seven- 21 ty-six-a, and seventy-eight of this chapter, provided that the civil 22 penalty against the holder of a wholesale license issued pursuant to 23 section fifty-three of this chapter shall not exceed the sum of ten 24 thousand dollars where that licensee violates provisions of this chapter 25 during the course of the sale of beer at retail to a person for consump- 26 tion at home, and the sum of one hundred thousand dollars as against the 27 holder of any license issued pursuant to sections fifty-one, sixty-one, 28 and sixty-two of this chapter. Any civil penalty so imposed shall be in 29 addition to and separate and apart from the terms and provisions of the 30 bond required pursuant to section one hundred twelve of this chapter. 31 Provided that no appeal is pending on the imposition of such civil 32 penalty, in the event such civil penalty imposed by the division remains 33 unpaid, in whole or in part, more than forty-five days after written 34 demand for payment has been sent by first class mail to the address of 35 the licensed premises, a notice of impending default judgment shall be 36 sent by first class mail to the licensed premises and by first class 37 mail to the last known home address of the person who signed the most 38 recent license application. The notice of impending default judgment 39 shall advise the licensee: (a) that a civil penalty was imposed on the 40 licensee; (b) the date the penalty was imposed; (c) the amount of the 41 civil penalty; (d) the amount of the civil penalty that remains unpaid 42 as of the date of the notice; (e) the violations for which the civil 43 penalty was imposed; and (f) that a judgment by default will be entered 44 in the supreme court of the county in which the licensed premises are 45 located, or other court of civil jurisdiction or any other place 46 provided for the entry of civil judgments within the state of New York 47 unless the division receives full payment of all civil penalties due 48 within twenty days of the date of the notice of impending default judg- 49 ment. If full payment shall not have been received by the division with- 50 in thirty days of mailing of the notice of impending default judgment, 51 the division shall proceed to enter with such court a statement of the 52 default judgment containing the amount of the penalty or penalties 53 remaining due and unpaid, along with proof of mailing of the notice of 54 impending default judgment. The filing of such judgment shall have the 55 full force and effect of a default judgment duly docketed with such 56 court pursuant to the civil practice law and rules and shall in all A. 7040--B 7 1 respects be governed by that chapter and may be enforced in the same 2 manner and with the same effect as that provided by law in respect to 3 execution issued against property upon judgments of a court of record. A 4 judgment entered pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in full force 5 and effect for eight years notwithstanding any other provision of law. 6 § 4. Subdivision 3 of section 17 of the alcoholic beverage control 7 law, as amended by section 9 of chapter 522 of the laws of 2018, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 3. To revoke, cancel or suspend for cause any license or permit issued 10 under this chapter and/or to impose a civil penalty for cause against 11 any holder of a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter. Any 12 civil penalty so imposed shall not exceed the sum of ten thousand 13 dollars as against the holder of any retail permit issued pursuant to 14 sections ninety-five, ninety-seven, ninety-eight, ninety-nine-d, and 15 paragraph f of subdivision one of section ninety-nine-b of this chapter, 16 and as against the holder of any retail license issued pursuant to 17 sections fifty-three-a, fifty-four, fifty-four-a, fifty-five, fifty- 18 five-a, sixty-three, sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-b, 19 sixty-four-c, sixty-four-f, seventy-six-f, seventy-nine, eighty-one, and 20 eighty-one-a of this chapter, and the sum of thirty thousand dollars as 21 against the holder of a license issued pursuant to sections thirty, 22 thirty-one, fifty-three, sixty-one-a, sixty-one-b, seventy-six, seven- 23 ty-six-a and seventy-eight of this chapter, provided that the civil 24 penalty against the holder of a wholesale license issued pursuant to 25 section fifty-three of this chapter shall not exceed the sum of ten 26 thousand dollars where that licensee violates provisions of this chapter 27 during the course of the sale of beer at retail to a person for consump- 28 tion at home, and the sum of one hundred thousand dollars as against the 29 holder of any license issued pursuant to sections fifty-one, sixty-one 30 and sixty-two of this chapter. Any civil penalty so imposed shall be in 31 addition to and separate and apart from the terms and provisions of the 32 bond required pursuant to section one hundred twelve of this chapter. 33 Provided that no appeal is pending on the imposition of such civil 34 penalty, in the event such civil penalty imposed by the division remains 35 unpaid, in whole or in part, more than forty-five days after written 36 demand for payment has been sent by first class mail to the address of 37 the licensed premises, a notice of impending default judgment shall be 38 sent by first class mail to the licensed premises and by first class 39 mail to the last known home address of the person who signed the most 40 recent license application. The notice of impending default judgment 41 shall advise the licensee: (a) that a civil penalty was imposed on the 42 licensee; (b) the date the penalty was imposed; (c) the amount of the 43 civil penalty; (d) the amount of the civil penalty that remains unpaid 44 as of the date of the notice; (e) the violations for which the civil 45 penalty was imposed; and (f) that a judgment by default will be entered 46 in the supreme court of the county in which the licensed premises are 47 located, or other court of civil jurisdiction, or any other place 48 provided for the entry of civil judgments within the state of New York 49 unless the division receives full payment of all civil penalties due 50 within twenty days of the date of the notice of impending default judg- 51 ment. If full payment shall not have been received by the division with- 52 in thirty days of mailing of the notice of impending default judgment, 53 the division shall proceed to enter with such court a statement of the 54 default judgment containing the amount of the penalty or penalties 55 remaining due and unpaid, along with proof of mailing of the notice of 56 impending default judgment. The filing of such judgment shall have the A. 7040--B 8 1 full force and effect of a default judgment duly docketed with such 2 court pursuant to the civil practice law and rules and shall in all 3 respects be governed by that chapter and may be enforced in the same 4 manner and with the same effect as that provided by law in respect to 5 execution issued against property upon judgments of a court of record. A 6 judgment entered pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in full force 7 and effect for eight years notwithstanding any other provision of law. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 9 it shall have become a law; provided however, that the amendments to 10 subdivision 3 of section 17 of the alcoholic beverage control law made 11 by section three of this act shall be subject to the expiration and 12 reversion of such section pursuant to section 4 of chapter 118 of the 13 laws of 2012, as amended, when upon such date the provisions of section 14 four of this act shall take effect. 15 Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 16 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 17 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 18 effective date.